District of Columbia statutes.
26-643

Commissioner’s powers; regulations.

(a)

The Commissioner shall have all of the powers granted to the Commissioner under the District of Columbia Banking Code to the extent appropriate to enable the Commissioner to supervise an international banking corporation office of an international banking corporation holding a license to maintain the office.

(b)

The Commissioner may promulgate, in addition to, and not inconsistent with, this chapter, general rules, regulations, and definitions and specific rulings, demands, and findings as the Commissioner may consider necessary for the proper conduct of the business authorized and licensed under, and for the enforcement of, this chapter.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-268, § 14, 48 DCR 1251

History

Banks and other financial institutions, reporting to Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions, see § 26-1308.

Cross References

Because of the enactment by D.C. Law 11-142 of subchapter II of Chapter 8 of Title 26 subchapter II of Chapter 7 of Title 26, 2001 Ed., the preexisting text was designated as subchapter I.

Editor's Notes